Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Mississippi Radiation Protection Law of 1976

§ 45-14-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Mississippi Radiation Protection Law of 1976.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-3.
Legislative declaration of policy.

It is the policy of the State of Mississippi in furtherance of its responsibility to protect the public health and safety:

To institute and maintain a program to permit development and utilization of sources of radiation for purposes consistent with the health and safety of the public, and

To prevent and/or reduce associated harmful effects of radiation upon the public through the institution and maintenance of a regulatory program for all sources of radiation; providing for: (1) a single, effective system of regulation within the state; (2) a system consonant insofar as possible with those of other states, and (3) compatibility with the standards and regulatory programs of the federal government for by-product, source, special nuclear materials, other radioactive materials and other sources of radiation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-5.
Definitions.

The following terms as used in this chapter shall have the meanings hereinafter ascribed to them, unless a different meaning is required by the context:

“Act” shall mean the Mississippi Radiation Protection Law of 1976;

“Agency” shall mean the Mississippi State Board of Health;

“Agreement materials” shall mean those materials licensed by the state under agreement with the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission and which include by-product, source or special nuclear materials in a quantity not sufficient to form a critical mass, as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 as amended;

“Agreement state” shall mean any state which had consummated an agreement with the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission under the authority of Section 274(b) of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954 as amended (73 Stat. 689), providing for acceptance by that state of licensing authority for agreement materials and the discontinuance of such activities by the commission;

“Atomic energy” shall mean all forms of energy released in the course of nuclear fission or nuclear fusion or other atomic transformations;

“Board” shall mean the state board of health;

“By-product material” shall mean any radioactive material, except special nuclear material, yielded in or made radioactive by exposure to the radiation incident to the process of producing or utilizing special nuclear material.

“Commission” shall mean the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, formerly known as the United States Atomic Energy Commission;

“Council” shall mean the Mississippi Radiation Advisory Council;

“Electronic product” shall mean any manufactured product or device or component part of such a product or device that has an electronic circuit, which during operation can generate or emit a physical field of radiation;

“Emergency” shall mean any condition existing outside the bounds of nuclear operating sites owned or licensed by a federal agency or any condition existing within or outside of the jurisdictional confines of a facility licensed by the agency and arising from by-product material, source material, special nuclear material or other radioactive materials, which is endangering or could reasonably be expected to endanger the health and safety of the public, or to contaminate the environment;

“Ionizing radiation” shall mean gamma rays and x-rays, alpha and beta particles, high speed electrons, neutrons, protons, and other nuclear particles; but not sound or radiowaves, or visible, infrared, or ultraviolet light;

“License” shall mean a license issued pursuant to regulations promulgated under the provisions of this chapter;

“Non-ionizing radiation” shall mean radiation not defined as ionizing radiation, including, but not limited to, such sources as lasers, masers or microwave devices; but does not include sonic, or infrasonic waves or thermally produced visible and infrared light;

“Nuclear energy” shall mean all forms of energy released in the course of nuclear fission or nuclear fusion or other atomic transformations;

“Person” shall mean any individual, corporation, partnership, firm, association, trust, estate, public or private institution, group, agency, political subdivision of this state, any other state or political subdivision or agency thereof, and any legal successor, representative, agent or agency of the foregoing, other than the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto, and other than federal government agencies licensed by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto;

“Radiation” shall mean gamma rays and x-rays, alpha and beta particles, high speed electrons, protons, neutrons, and other nuclear particles, and electromagnetic radiation consisting of associated and interacting electric and magnetic waves and ultrasonic waves;

“Radiation machine” shall mean any device capable of producing radiation or nuclear particles when the associated control devices of the machine are operated;

“Radioactive material” shall mean any solid, liquid or gas which emits radiation spontaneously;

“Registration” shall mean a registration issued pursuant to regulations promulgated under the provisions of this chapter;

“Source of radiation” shall mean any radioactive material or any device or equipment emitting or capable of producing radiation;

“Source material” shall mean (1) uranium, thorium or any other material which the agency declares to be source material after the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto, has determined the material to be such; or (2) ores containing one (1) or more of the foregoing materials, in such concentration as the agency declares by order to be source material after the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto, has determined the material in such concentration to be source material, and

“Special nuclear material” shall mean (1) plutonium, uranium 233, uranium enriched in the isotope 233 or in the isotope 235, and any other material which the agency declares to be special nuclear material after the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or any successor thereto, has determined the material to be such, but does not include source material; or (2) any material artificially enriched by any of the foregoing, but does not include source material.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-7.
State board of health to administer statewide radiation protection program; creation and duties of state radiation advisory council.

The state board of health is hereby designated as the state agency to administer a statewide radiation protection program consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

There is hereby created and established the Mississippi Radiation Advisory Council as a separate division of the agency. It is made the duty of the council, and it is hereby granted the authority to:

Advise the agency in the development of comprehensive policies and programs for the evaluation, determination and reduction of hazards associated with the use of radiation, and

Assist in the formulation and approval of rules, regulations and standards relating to receipt, possession, use, transfer, ownership, acquisition, manufacture, production, transportation, handling, servicing, installation, storage, disposal, sale, lease or other disposition of sources of radiation as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The recommendation of nationally recognized bodies in the field of radiation protection shall be taken into consideration in the formulation of such rules, regulations and standards.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-9.
Radiation advisory council; membership; meetings; quorum; compensation of members.

The council shall consist of the director of radiological health within the state board of health, who shall serve ex officio as secretary, and six (6) members appointed by the state board of health as follows:

One (1) member from the Mississippi Medical Association for a term of three (3) years;

One (1) member from the Mississippi Dental Association for a term of three (3) years;

One (1) member from the Mississippi Radiological Society for a term of four (4) years;

One (1) licensed chiropractor for a term of four (4) years;

One (1) member having recognized knowledge in the radiation field from private industry in Mississippi for a term of four (4) years; and

One (1) member having recognized knowledge in the radiation field from one (1) of the Mississippi institutions of higher learning for a term of four (4) years.

The members described above and serving on the council on June 30, 1984, shall continue to serve on the council until the expiration of their terms.

The chairman of the council shall be selected by and from the council membership.

The council shall meet at the call of the chairman but at least once a year.

Upon the request of three (3) or more members, it shall be the duty of the chairman to call a meeting of the council. Minutes of the meetings of the council shall be transmitted to the secretary and executive officer of the state board of health.

A majority of the council shall constitute a quorum to conduct business.

Any member may be removed prior to the expiration of his term by the state board of health. His removal may be based upon wilful neglect of duty or impropriety in office.

Members of the council shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses, including food, lodging and mileage as authorized by Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, required for attendance at council meetings. Council members shall receive a per diem for attendance at council meetings as is authorized under Section 25-3-69.

All clerical and other services required by the council shall be supplied by the agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 5; Laws, 1978, ch. 439, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 522, § 42; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 313, eff from and after July 1, 1984.

§ 45-14-11.
General powers of state board of health.

In order to provide for the protection of the public health and safety, the agency is empowered to:

Develop comprehensive policies and programs for the evaluation, determination and amelioration of hazards associated with the use of sources of radiation. Such policies and programs shall be developed with due regard for compatibility with federal programs for the control and regulation of sources of radiation;

Advise, consult and cooperate with other public agencies and with affected groups and industries;

Encourage, participate in or conduct studies, investigations, public hearings, training, research and demonstrations relating to the control of sources of radiation, the measurement of radiation, the effect upon public health and safety of exposure to radiation and related problems;

Adopt, promulgate, amend and repeal such rules, regulations and standards which may provide for licensing or registration relating to the receipt, possession, use, transfer, ownership, acquisition, manufacture, production, transportation, handling, storage, disposal, sale, lease or other disposition of sources of radiation as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The recommendations of nationally recognized experts in the field of radiation protection shall be taken into consideration;

Provide necessary and desirable services to any agency of the state which will acquire, lease, develop or operate land and facilities to be used for fostering development of the state’s economic potential in the nuclear energy field, including, but not limited to, the concentration or storage of radioactive by-products and wastes. Such services may include, but are not limited to, site evaluation, critique of private or public site monitoring activities, and developing plans for perpetual custody and maintenance of radioactive materials held for custodial purposes at any publicly or privately operated facility located within the state;

Require, for new construction and material alterations, submission of plans, specifications and reports on: (1) design and protective shielding of installations for sources of radiation, and (2) systems for the disposal of radioactive waste material and (3) the determination of any radiation hazard. The agency may render opinions, approve or disapprove such plans and specifications;

Require all sources of radiation to be shielded, transported, handled, used, stored or disposed of in such manner as to comply with the provisions of this chapter and rules, regulations and standards promulgated thereunder;

Collect and disseminate information relating to the control of sources of radiation, including, but not limited to: (1) maintenance of a file of all license applications, issuances, denials, amendments, transfers, renewals, modifications, suspensions and revocations, and (2) maintenance of a file of registrants possessing sources of radiation requiring registration under the provisions of this chapter, and regulations thereunder, and any administrative or judicial action pertaining thereto;

Require, on forms prescribed and furnished by the agency, registration, periodic re-registration, or licensing of persons to use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own or possess sources of radiation;

Exempt certain sources of radiation or kinds of uses or users from the licensing or registration requirements set forth in this chapter when the agency determines that the exemption of such sources of radiation or kinds of users or uses will not constitute a significant risk to the health and safety of the public;

Promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to this chapter which may provide for recognition of other state and federal licenses and registrations as the agency shall deem desirable, subject to such requirements as it may prescribe; and exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter;

Conduct environmental radiation surveillance and monitoring programs for evaluating levels of radioactive materials in the environment, including, but not limited to, levels of radioactive materials near nuclear powered electrical generating plants and other nuclear facilities;

Provide, by rules and regulations, for an electronic products safety program to protect the public health and safety. Such program shall authorize regulation and inspection of sources of non-ionizing radiation throughout the state;

Respond to any emergency which involves possible or actual release of radioactive materials; respond, coordinate decontamination, and otherwise protect the public health and safety in any manner deemed necessary. This chapter does not in any way, alter or change the provisions of the Executive Order No. 185, dated August 26, 1974, concerning response during an emergency by the state civil defense council;

Develop and implement a responsible data management program for the purpose of collecting and analyzing statistical information necessary to protect the public health and safety; and

Enforce the provisions and policies of the Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management Compact as provided in Section 57-47-1 and regulations promulgated pursuant to Section 57-47-1.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 6; Laws, 1991, ch. 343 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 1991).

§ 45-14-13.
Licensing and registration of persons to deal with sources of radiation, installations, or equipment utilizing such sources.

The agency shall provide by rule and regulation, for licensing and registration of persons to use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own or possess sources of radiation, installations, or equipment utilizing such sources. Such rule or regulation shall provide for amendment, suspension or revocation of licenses or registrations. Each application for a specific license shall be in writing on forms prescribed and furnished by the agency and shall state, and be accompanied by, such information or documents, including, but not limited to, plans, specifications and reports for new construction or material alterations as the agency may determine to be reasonable and necessary to decide the qualifications of the applicant to protect the public health and safety. The agency may require all applications or statements to be made under oath or affirmation. Each license shall be in such form and contain such terms and conditions as the agency may deem necessary. No license issued under the authority of this chapter and no right to possess or utilize sources of radiation granted by any license shall be assigned or in any manner disposed of; and the terms and conditions of all licenses shall be subject to amendment, revisions or modification by rules, regulations or orders issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

Any person who, on the effective date of any agreement with the commission, possesses a license issued by the commission shall be deemed to possess the same pursuant to a license issued under this chapter, which shall expire either ninety (90) days after receipt from the agency of a notice of expiration of such license, or on the date of expiration specified in the federal license, whichever is earlier.

Each registration shall be in writing on forms prescribed and furnished by the agency. The agency may require all registrations or statements to be made under oath or affirmation. Each registration shall be in such form and contain such terms and conditions as the agency may deem necessary. No registration issued under the authority of this chapter and no right to possess or utilize sources of radiation granted by any registration shall be assigned or in any manner disposed of; and the terms and conditions of all registrations shall be subject to amendment, revisions or modification by rules, regulations or orders, issued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-15.
Inspections by state board of health; training and education programs; agreements with federal and state governments.

Authorized representatives of the agency shall have the authority to enter upon any public or private property of permittees, registrants and licensees, including private dwellings used for business purposes, at all reasonable times for the purpose of determining compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules, regulations and standards adopted hereunder. Authorized representatives of the agency, only in the event of a declared emergency, shall have the authority to enter upon any public or private property, including private dwellings used for business purposes, at all reasonable times for the purpose of determining compliance with the provisions of this chapter and rules, regulations and standards adopted hereunder.

The agency is authorized to institute training programs for its personnel to carry out the provisions of this chapter and may make personnel available for participation in any program or programs of the federal government, other states or interstate agencies in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.

The agency is authorized to institute educational programs for the purpose of training or educating persons who may possess, use, handle, transport or service sources of radiation.

The Governor is authorized to enter into agreements with the federal government, other states or interstate agencies, whereby this state will perform, on a cooperative basis with the federal government, other states, or interstate agencies, inspections, emergency response to radiation accidents and other functions related to the control of radiation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-17.
Attorney General shall counsel persons against whom tort claims arise for their assistance during an emergency.

In any and all tort claims against any person which arise while that person is rendering assistance during an emergency (1) at the request of any authorized representative of the agency or (2) pursuant to an agreement for mutual state radiological assistance as provided for in Section 45-14-15(4), the provisions of Section 7-5-43, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall apply as if such person were an employee of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-19.
Records to be kept by persons possessing or using sources of radiation; furnishing employees their personnel exposure records.

The agency is authorized to require each person who possesses or uses a source of radiation: (a) to maintain appropriate records relating to its receipt, storage, use, transfer or disposal and maintain such other records as the agency may require, subject to such exemptions as may be provided by rules and regulations; and (b) to maintain appropriate records showing the radiation exposure of all individuals for whom personnel monitoring may be required by the agency, subject to such exemptions as may be provided by rules and regulations. Copies of all records required to be kept by this chapter shall be submitted to the agency or its duly authorized agents upon request.

The agency is authorized to require that any person possessing or using a source of radiation, at the request of any employee, furnish to each employee for whom personnel monitoring is required a copy of such employee’s personnel exposure record annually, and upon termination of employment at any time such employee has received excessive exposure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-21.
Refusal to grant license or registration; suspension, revocation or amendment of license or registration; emergency orders.

The agency may refuse to grant a license or registration as provided in Sections 45-14-11 and 45-14-13 to any applicant or registrant who does not possess the requirements or qualifications which the agency may prescribe in rules and regulations, or who has been refused issuance or renewal of a license, registration, permit or certificate by a licensing or registering authority of another state or the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, or whose license, registration, permit or certificate has been revoked, suspended or restricted by such licensing or registering authority. The agency may suspend, revoke or amend any license or registration in the event that the person to whom such license or registration was granted violates any of the rules and regulations of the agency, or ceases, or fails to have the reasonable facilities prescribed by the agency, or has a license, registration, permit or certificate revoked, suspended or restricted by a licensing or registering authority of another state, or the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission. Provided, that before any order is entered denying an application for a license or registration or suspending, revoking, modifying or amending a license or registration previously granted, the applicant or person to whom such license or registration was granted shall be given notice and granted a hearing by the state health officer.

Whenever the agency in its opinion finds that an emergency exists requiring immediate action to protect the public health and safety, the agency may, without notice or hearing, issue an order reciting the existence of such emergency and requiring that such action be taken as is necessary to meet the emergency. Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, such order shall be effective immediately. Any person to whom such order is directed shall comply therewith immediately, and on application to the agency shall be afforded a hearing within ten (10) days. On the basis of such a hearing, the emergency order shall be continued, modified or revoked within thirty (30) days after such hearing, as the board, with consultation of the council, may deem appropriate under the evidence.

Any applicant or person to whom a license or registration was granted who shall be aggrieved by any order of the agency or its duly authorized agent denying such application or suspending, revoking or amending such license or registration, may appeal directly to the chancery court of the county of his residence, or if he is a nonresident, to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 11; Laws, 1979, ch. 399, eff from and after passage (approved March 20, 1979).

§ 45-14-23.
Emergency impounding of sources of radiation.

Authorized representatives of the agency shall have the authority in the event of an emergency to impound or order the impounding of sources of radiation in the possession of any person who is not equipped to observe or fails to observe the provisions of this chapter or any rules or regulations issued thereunder.

The agency may release such sources of radiation to the owner thereof upon terms and conditions in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted thereunder or may bring an action in the chancery court of the county wherein the cause of action occurred for an order condemning such sources of radiation and providing for their destruction or other disposition so as to protect the public health and safety.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-25.
Transportation of radioactive materials.

The agency is authorized to adopt, promulgate, amend and repeal rules and regulations governing the transportation of radioactive materials in Mississippi, which, in the judgment of the council, shall promote the public health, safety or welfare and protect the environment.

Such rules and regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, provisions for the use of signs designating radioactive material cargo, for the packaging, marking, loading and handling of radioactive materials and the precautions necessary to determine whether the material when offered is in proper condition for transport, and may include designation of routes in this state which are to be used for the transportation of radioactive materials.

Such rules and regulations shall not include the carrier vehicle or its equipment, the licensing of packages, nor shall they apply to the handling or transportation of radioactive material within the confines of a facility licensed by or owned by a federal agency.

The agency, in consultation with the council, is authorized to adopt by reference, in whole or in part, such federal rules and regulations governing the transportation of radioactive material which are established by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission, the United States Federal Aviation Agency, the United States Department of Transportation, the United States Coast Guard or the United States Post Office (or any federal agency which is a successor to any of the foregoing agencies), as such federal rules may be amended from time to time.

The agency shall not promulgate any rules or regulations pertaining to matters within the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Transportation or the United States Federal Aviation Administration under the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, except to the extent that the agency adopts by reference rules or regulations issued by the United States Department of Transportation or the United States Federal Aviation Administration, and except as provided in 49 USCS Section 1811(b).

The agency is authorized to enter into agreements with the respective federal agencies designed to avoid duplication of effort and/or conflict in enforcement and inspection activities so that:

Rules and regulations adopted by the agency pursuant to this chapter may be enforced, within their respective jurisdictions, by any authorized representatives of the agency and other state agencies, according to mutual understandings between such agencies of their respective responsibilities and authorities.

The agency, through any authorized representative, is authorized to inspect any records of persons engaged in the transportation of radioactive materials during the hours of business operation when such records reasonably relate to the method or contents of packaging, marking, loading, handling or shipping of radioactive materials within the state.

The agency, through any authorized representative, may enter upon and inspect the premises or vehicles of any person engaged in the transportation of radioactive materials during hours of business operation, with or without a warrant, for the purpose of determining compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder.

Upon a determination by the agency that any provision of this chapter, or the rules and regulations promulgated hereunder, are being violated or that any practice in the transportation of radioactive materials constitutes a clear and imminent danger to the public health, property or safety, it may issue an order requiring correction.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-27.
Liability for state coordination of decontamination of radiation accidents or perpetual maintenance and custody of radioactive materials.

Upon completion of any project or activity regarding emergency response to and coordination of decontamination of radiation accidents or perpetual maintenance and custody of radioactive materials, each agency of the state that has participated by furnishing personnel, equipment or material shall deliver to the agency record of the expenses incurred by that agency. The amount of incurred expenses shall be disbursed by the secretary and executive officer of the state board of health to each agency from funds available therefor. Upon completion of such project or activity, the agency shall prepare a statement of all expenses and costs for the project or activity expended by the state and shall make demand for payment upon the person having control over the radioactive materials or the release thereof which necessitated said project or activity. Any person having control over the radioactive materials or the release thereof and any other person causing or contributing to an incident necessitating such project or activity stated in this subsection shall be directly liable to the state for the necessary expenses incurred thereby and the state shall have a cause of action to recover from any or all such persons. If the person having control over the radioactive materials or the release thereof shall fail or refuse to pay the sum expended by the state, the agency shall refer the matter to the Attorney General of Mississippi who shall institute an action in the name of the state in the chancery court of the county in which the project or activity was undertaken by the state to recover such cost and expenses.

In any action instituted by the attorney general under this chapter, a verified and itemized statement of the expenses incurred by the state in any project or activity stated in subsection (1) of this section, shall be filed with the complaint and shall constitute a prima facie case, and the state shall be entitled to a judgment thereon in the absence of allegation and proof on the part of the defendant or defendants that:

the statement of expenses incurred by the state is not correct because of an error in the calculation of the amount due; or

the statement of the amount due is not correct because of an error in not properly crediting the account with any cash payment, or payments, or other satisfaction, which may have been made thereon.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-29.
Bond, insurance or other security of persons dealing in radioactive materials.

No person shall use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own or possess radioactive materials until that person shall have procured and filed with the agency such bond, insurance or other security as the agency may by regulation require. Such bond, insurance or other security shall:

run in favor of the State of Mississippi in the amount set by the agency which shall be a reasonable amount commensurate with the possible danger and potential damage which may occur due to the use, manufacture, production, transportation, transfer, receipt, acquisition or possession of radioactive materials; provided, however, that the minimum amounts shall be as follows:

One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for all damages because of bodily injury sustained by one (1) person as the result of any one (1) occurrence and Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) for all damages because of bodily injury sustained by two (2) or more persons as the result of any one (1) occurrence;

One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) for all claims arising out of damage to property as the result of any one (1) occurrence including completed operations, with an aggregate limit of Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00) for all property damage to which the policy applied; and

have as guarantor on such bond or insurance a surety company licensed to do business in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-31.
Fees for radiological health services [Repealed effective July 1, 2020].

All initial application and registration fees and annual fees due under this section shall be paid directly to the agency for deposit into the Radiological Health Operations Fund in the State Treasury. The Mississippi State Board of Health shall submit its separate budget for carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The budget shall be subject to and shall comply with the requirements of the state budget law.

In order to supplement state radiological health budget allocations authorized to carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter, the agency is authorized to charge and collect fees for the following radiological health services:

Radiological health services — Category 1: application fee and annual fee not to exceed. . . . .$3,500.00

Radiological health services — Category 2: application fee and annual fee not to exceed. . . . .$1,800.00

Radiological health services — Category 3: application fee and annual fee not to exceed. . . . .$1,800.00

Healing arts and veterinary medicine X-ray tubes: application fee and annual fee not to exceed. . . . .$150.00

The radiological health services that are included in each specified category shall be determined by the agency by rules and regulations adopted by the agency.

The agency may increase the amount of the fees charged under this subsection not more than two (2) times during the period from July 1, 2016, through June 30, 2020, with the percentage of each increase being not more than five percent (5%) of the amount of the fee in effect at the time of the increase.

The agency shall set the amount of the fees for all other radiological health services not specified in subsection (2) of this section, and any increase in the fees charged by the agency under this subsection shall be in accordance with the provisions of Section 41-3-65.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 16; Laws, 1979, ch. 341; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 215; Laws, 1986, ch. 371, § 16; Laws, 1990, ch. 376, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 606, § 10; Laws, 2000, ch. 429, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 389, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 510, § 37, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 45-14-33.
Unlawful acts.

It shall be unlawful for any person to use, manufacture, produce, transport, transfer, receive, acquire, own or possess any source of radiation unless licensed, registered or exempted by the agency in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated hereunder. The provisions of this chapter regarding licensing, permits, registration and bonding shall not apply to the use, ownership, transportation, acquisition, receipt or transferral of household consumer products when so used, owned, transported, acquired, received or transferred by retailers or consumers of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-35.
Local ordinances, resolutions and regulations relating to sources of radiation are not superseded.

Ordinances, resolutions or regulations, now or hereafter in effect, of the governing body of a municipality or county or the political entity relating to sources of radiation shall not be superseded by this chapter; provided, that such ordinances or regulations are and continue to be no more restrictive than, and consistent and compatible with, the provisions of this chapter, as amended, and rules and regulations promulgated by the agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-37.
Penalties.

Any person who willfully and knowingly violates any provisions of this chapter or rules and regulations promulgated hereunder, or who hinders, obstructs or otherwise interferes with any authorized representative of the agency in the discharge of his official duties in making inspections as provided in Section 45-14-15(1) or in impounding sources of radiation as provided in Section 45-14-23 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-39.
Report to air and water pollution control commission as to waters containing radioactive materials.

When the agency determines that any waters contain any radioactive materials, the agency shall submit a report so advising the Mississippi Air and Water Pollution Control Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 45-14-41.
No state jurisdiction over federally licensed and regulated nuclear powered steam electric generating plants.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to confer jurisdiction to the State of Mississippi over the construction, operation or maintenance of nuclear powered steam electric generating plants licensed and regulated by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission or any successor agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 469, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).